Hawaii statutes.
[§11-344] Sale or use of
information. No information in the reports or copies of the reports filed
with the commission shall be sold or used by any person for the purpose of
soliciting contributions or for any commercial purpose. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next